Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2807.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 13, chapter 23, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-2324, to read: START_STATUTE13-2324. Terrorist organization designation; attorney general investigation; federal determinations; civil penalty; annual report; classification; definitions A. The attorney general may initiate an investigation into any organization within this state that is believed to be a muslim brotherhood affiliate.  The attorney general shall designate a muslim brotherhood affiliate as a terrorist organization. B. Before designation as a terrorist organization, the attorney general shall do all of the following: 1. Issue a draft designation notice with written justification and supporting evidence to the entity. 2. At least thirty days before the designation, publish a public notice that summarizes the basis for the proposed designation. 3. Provide the entity with an opportunity to respond in writing to the proposed designation and to appear before an independent review board. C. After the review period, the attorney general may issue a final designation order that identifies the organization as a terrorist organization and the evidence relied on for the designation. D. The attorney general may use designations or findings made by the United States secretary of state pursuant to section 219(a) of the Immigration and Nationality Act (66 stat. 163; 8 United States code section 1189(a)) as prima facie evidence when investigating and making a determination whether an entity qualifies as a muslim brotherhood-affiliated terrorist organization pursuant to this section. E. On designation as a muslim brotherhood-affiliated terrorist organization, an organization or an individual acting on the organization's behalf may not do any of the following: 1. Operate, maintain offices, solicit monies or recruit members within this state. 2. Request a grant, enter into a contract or lease or receive a permit from any state or local government entity. 3. Receive public monies, tax credits or subsidies. F. each state and local government entity shall terminate any existing contract or license with a designated organization within one hundred eighty days after the designation unless a court grants a temporary exemption for good cause. g. The attorney general may impose a civil penalty of not more than $50,000 for violations of subsection E, F or j of this section and recover damages to this state. h. The attorney general may initiate the seizure of any state-registered assets that belong to a designated organization after due process proceedings in the superior court. i. Beginning on January 1, 2027 and each year thereafter, the attorney general shall submit a report to the governor, the president of the Senate and the speaker of the House of Representatives that identifies each designated organization, any actions taken against the entity and the justification for the designation. j. A person who knowingly aids, funds or conceals a designated organization is guilty of a class 4 felony. K. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Designated organization" means an organization that is formally designated as a muslim brotherhood-affiliated terrorist organization. 2. "Material support" includes financial contributions, logistical services, communications, training, recruitment or coordination offered to or on behalf of a designated entity. 3. "Muslim brotherhood" means an entity that subscribes to or derives from the ideology of the muslim brotherhood organization founded by Hassan al-Banna in 1928, including any branch, network or affiliate that has engaged in or provides material support for terrorist acts or has been designated by the federal government or a foreign authority as a muslim brotherhood affiliate. 4. "Organization" means any corporation, association, partnership, trust or other entity, including subsidiaries and affiliates. 5. "Terrorist acts" means acts that are dangerous to human life and that violate a criminal law or that are intended to intimidate or coerce a civilian population or government. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Severability If a provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable. Sec. 3. Short title This act may be cited as the "Arizona Muslim Brotherhood Terrorist Designation Act".